District of Columbia statutes.
3-1207.41

Scope of practice.

(a)

Except as provided in § 3-1205.02(a)(2A), an individual shall be licensed by the Board of Pharmacy before engaging in the practice of pharmaceutical detailing in the District of Columbia.

(b)

A pharmaceutical detailer shall not:

(1)

Engage in any deceptive or misleading marketing of a pharmaceutical product, including the knowing concealment, suppression, omission, misleading representation, or misstatement of any material fact;

(2)

Use a title or designation that might lead a licensed health professional, or an employee or representative of a licensed health professional, to believe that the pharmaceutical detailer is licensed to practice medicine, nursing, dentistry, optometry, pharmacy, or other similar health occupation, in the District of Columbia, unless the pharmaceutical detailer currently holds such a license; or

(3)

Attend patient examinations without the consent of the patient.

Mar. 25, 1986, D.C. Law 6-99, § 741
as added Mar. 26, 2008, D.C. Law 17-131, § 102(g), 55 DCR 1659
Oct. 22, 2015, D.C. Law 21-36, § 5032(b), 62 DCR 10905
The 2015 amendment by D.C. Law 21-36 added “Except as provided in § 3-1205.02(a)(2A)” in (a).
For temporary (90 days) addition of this section, see § 5032(b) of the Fiscal Year 2016 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2015 (D.C. Act 21-127, July 27, 2015, 62 DCR 10201).
Delegation of Authority pursuant to D.C. Law 17-131, the SafeRX Amendment Act of 2008, see Mayor’s Order 2008-83, June 11, 2008 ( 55 DCR 9360).
Delegation of Authority pursuant to D.C. Law 17-131, the SafeRX Amendment Act of 2008, see Mayor’s Order 2008-94, July 3, 2008 ( 55 DCR 9375).